Utah statutes.
31A-21-112.   Language other than English.

(1)  An insurer may conduct a transaction in a language other than English through an employee or agent acting as interpreter or through an interpreter provided by the customer.

(2)  An insurer may provide a customer an insurance policy, endorsement, rider, or explanatory or advertising material in a language other than English.  If there is a dispute or complaint regarding the insurance policy, endorsement, rider, or explanatory or advertising material, the English language version of the insurance coverage shall control the resolution of the dispute or complaint.

(3)  A non-English language policy delivered or issued for delivery in this state is considered to be in compliance with this title if the insurer certifies that the policy is translated from an English language policy that complies with this title.

(4)  If an insurance policy, endorsement, or rider is provided in a language other than English, it shall be accompanied by:

(a)  the corresponding English language version; and

(b)  a disclaimer in both English and the other language that states that the foreign language version is provided only as an accommodation or courtesy to the customer and the English language version shall control the resolution of any dispute or complaint.



Enacted by Chapter 443, 2013 General Session

